Maryland, session 2025, HB0312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
3–107.
(a) Whether or not the defendant is confined and unless A VICTIM WHO HAS
FILED A NOTIFICATION REQUEST FORM UNDER § 11–104 OF THIS ARTICLE OR the
State petitions the court for extraordinary cause to extend the time, the court shall dismiss
the charge against a defendant found incompetent to stand trial under this subtitle:
(1) WHEN CHARGED WITH MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE IN
VIOLATION OF § 2–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE
BEHAVIOR AS DEFINED IN § 10–923 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE, AFTER THE LESSER
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0312*

HOUSE BILL 312
OF THE EXPIRATION OF 10 YEARS OR THE MAXIMUM SENTENCE FOR THE MOST
SERIOUS OFFENSE CHARGED;
(2) when charged with a felony or a crime of violence as defined under §
14–101 of the Criminal Law Article NOT COVERED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, after the lesser of the expiration of 5 years or the maximum sentence for the
most serious offense charged; or
[(2)] (3) when charged with an offense not covered under item (1) OR (2)
of this subsection, after the lesser of the expiration of 3 years or the maximum sentence for
the most serious offense charged.
(b) Whether or not the defendant is confined, if the court considers that resuming
the criminal proceeding would be unjust because so much time has passed since the
defendant was found incompetent to stand trial, the court shall dismiss the charge without
prejudice. However, the court may not dismiss a charge without providing the State’s
Attorney and a victim or victim’s representative who has requested notification under §
3–123(c) of this title advance notice and an opportunity to be heard.
(c) If charges are dismissed under this section, the court shall notify:
(1) the victim of the crime charged or the victim’s representative who has
requested notification under § 3–123(c) of this title; and
(2) the Criminal Justice Information System Central Repository.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.